North Carolina statutes. Chapter 113A. Pollution Control and Environment.
Article 7. Coastal Area Management.
§ 113A-107.
State guidelines for the coastal area.

State guidelines for the coastal area shall consist of statements of objectives, policies, and standards to be followed in public and private use of land and water areas within the coastal area. Such guidelines shall be consistent with the goals of the coastal area management system as set forth in

G.S. 113A-102

. They shall give particular attention to the nature of development which shall be appropriate within the various types of areas of environmental concern that may be designated by the Commission under Part 3. Land and water areas addressed in the State guidelines may include underground areas and resources, and airspace above the land and water, as well as the surface of the land and surface waters. Such guidelines shall be used in the review of applications for permits issued pursuant to this Article and for review of and comment on proposed public, private and federal agency activities that are subject to review for consistency with State guidelines for the coastal area. Such comments shall be consistent with federal laws and regulations.

The Commission shall be responsible for the preparation, adoption, and amendment of the State guidelines. In exercising this function it shall be furnished such staff assistance as it requires by the Secretary of Environmental Quality and the Secretary of the Department of Administration, together with such incidental assistance as may be requested of any other State department or agency.

The Commission shall mail proposed as well as adopted rules establishing guidelines for the coastal area to all cities, counties, and lead regional organizations within the area and to all State, private, federal, regional, and local agencies the Commission considers to have special expertise on the coastal area. A person who receives a proposed rule may send written comments on the proposed rule to the Commission within 30 days after receiving the proposed rule. The Commission shall consider any comments received in determining whether to adopt the proposed rule.

, (e) Repealed by Session Laws 1987, c. 827, s. 134.

(f)

The Commission shall review its rules establishing guidelines for the coastal area at least every five years to determine whether changes in the rules are needed.

History.

1973, c. 1284, s. 1; 1975, c. 452, s. 5; 1975, 2nd Sess., c. 983, ss. 75, 76; 1977, c. 771, s. 4; 1981, c. 932, s. 2.1; 1987, c. 827, s. 134; 1989, c. 313; c. 727, s. 218(65); 1997-443, s. 11A.119(a); 2015-241, s. 14.30(v).

§ 113A-107.1.
Sea-level policy.

The General Assembly does not intend to mandate the development of sea-level policy or the definition of rates of sea-level change for regulatory purposes.

No rule, policy, or planning guideline that defines a rate of sea-level change for regulatory purposes shall be adopted except as provided by this section.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit a county, municipality, or other local government entity from defining rates of sea-level change for regulatory purposes.

All policies, rules, regulations, or any other product of the Commission or the Division related to rates of sea-level change shall be subject to the requirements of Chapter 150B of the General Statutes.

The Commission shall be the only State agency authorized to define rates of sea-level change for regulatory purposes. If the Commission defines rates of sea-level change for regulatory purposes, it shall do so in conjunction with the Division of Coastal Management of the Department. The Commission and Division may collaborate with other State agencies, boards, and commissions; other public entities; and other institutions when defining rates of sea-level change.

History.

2012-202, s. 2(a).

§ 113A-108.
Effect of State guidelines.

All local land-use plans adopted pursuant to this Article within the coastal area shall be consistent with the State guidelines. No permit shall be issued under Part 4 of this Article which is inconsistent with the State guidelines. Any State land policies governing the acquisition, use and disposition of land by State departments and agencies shall take account of and be consistent with the State guidelines adopted under this Article, insofar as lands within the coastal area are concerned. Any State land classification system which shall be promulgated shall take account of and be consistent with the State guidelines adopted under this Article, insofar as it applies to lands within the coastal area.

History.

1973, c. 1284, s. 1; 1975, c. 452, s. 5; 1981, c. 932, s. 2.1.

§ 113A-109.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2017-10, s. 3.8, effective May 4, 2017.

History.

1973, c. 1284, s. 1; 1975, c. 452, ss. 1, 5; 1981, c. 932, s. 2.1; repealed by 2017-10, s. 3.8, effective May 4, 2017.

§ 113A-110.
Land-use plans.

A land-use plan for a county shall, for the purpose of this Article, consist of statements of objectives, policies, and standards to be followed in public and private use of land within the county, which shall be supplemented by maps showing the appropriate location of particular types of land or water use and their relationships to each other and to public facilities and by specific criteria for particular types of land or water use in particular areas. The plan shall give special attention to the protection and appropriate development of areas of environmental concern designated under Part 3. The plan shall be consistent with the goals of the coastal area management system as set forth in

G.S. 113A-102

and with the State guidelines adopted by the Commission under

G.S. 113A-107

. The plan shall be adopted, and may be amended from time to time, in accordance with the procedures set forth in this section.

The body charged with preparation and adoption of a county’s land-use plan (whether the county government or the Commission) may delegate some or all of its responsibilities to the lead regional organization for the region of which the county is a part. Any such delegation shall become effective upon the acceptance thereof by the lead regional organization. Any county proposing a delegation to the lead regional organization shall give written notice thereof to the Commission at least two weeks prior to the date on which such action is to be taken. Any city or county within the coastal area may also seek the assistance or advice of its lead regional organization in carrying out any planning activity under this Article.

The body charged with preparation and adoption of a county’s land-use plan (whether the county or the Commission or a unit delegated such responsibility) may either (i) delegate to a city within the county responsibility for preparing those portions of the land-use plan which affect land within the city’s zoning jurisdiction or (ii) receive recommendations from the city concerning those portions of the land-use plan which affect land within the city’s zoning jurisdiction, prior to finally adopting the plan or any amendments thereto or (iii) delegate responsibility to some cities and receive recommendations from other cities in the county. The body shall give written notice to the Commission of its election among these alternatives. On written application from a city to the Commission, the Commission shall require the body to delegate plan-making authority to that city for land within the city’s zoning jurisdiction if the Commission finds that the city is currently enforcing its zoning ordinance, its subdivision regulations, and the State Building Code within such jurisdiction.

The body charged with adoption of a land-use plan may either adopt it as a whole by a single resolution or adopt it in parts by successive resolutions; said parts may either correspond with major geographical sections or divisions of the county or with functional subdivisions of the subject matters of the plan. Amendments and extensions to the plan may be adopted in the same manner.

Prior to adoption or subsequent amendment of any land-use plan, the body charged with its preparation and adoption (whether the county or the Commission or a unit delegated such responsibility) shall hold a public hearing at which public and private parties shall have the opportunity to present comments and recommendations. Notice of the hearing shall be given not less than 30 days before the date of the hearing and shall state the date, time, and place of the hearing; the subject of the hearing; the action which is proposed; and that copies of the proposed plan or amendment are available for public inspection at a designated office in the county courthouse during designated hours. Any such notice shall be published at least once in a newspaper of general circulation in the county.

No land-use plan shall become finally effective until it has been approved by the Commission. The county or other unit adopting the plan shall transmit it, when adopted, to the Commission for review. The Commission shall afford interested persons an opportunity to present objections and comments regarding the plan, and shall review and consider each county land-use plan in light of such objections and comments, the State guidelines, the requirements of this Article, and any generally applicable standards of review adopted by rule of the Commission. Within 45 days after receipt of a county land-use plan the Commission shall either approve the plan or notify the county of the specific changes which must be made in order for it to be approved. Following such changes, the plan may be resubmitted in the same manner as the original plan.

Copies of each county land-use plan which has been approved, and as it may have been amended from time to time, shall be maintained in a form available for public inspection by (i) the county, (ii) the Commission, and (iii) the lead regional organization of the region which includes the county.

History.

1973, c. 1284, s. 1; 1975, c. 452, s. 5; 1981, c. 932, s. 2.1.

Legal Periodicals.

For comment on public participation in local land use planning, see 53 N.C.L. Rev. 975 (1975).

§ 113A-111.
Effect of land-use plan.

No permit shall be issued under Part 4 of this Article for development which is inconsistent with the approved land-use plan for the county in which it is proposed. No local ordinance or other local regulation shall be adopted which, within an area of environmental concern, is inconsistent with the land-use plan of the county or city in which it is effective; any existing local ordinances and regulations within areas of environmental concern shall be reviewed in light of the applicable local land-use plan and modified as may be necessary to make them consistent therewith. All local ordinances and other local regulations affecting a county within the coastal area, but not affecting an area of environmental concern, shall be reviewed by the Commission for consistency with the applicable county and city land-use plans and, if the Commission finds any such ordinance or regulation to be inconsistent with the applicable land-use plan, it shall transmit recommendations for modification to the adopting local government.

History.

1973, c. 1284, s. 1; 1975, c. 452, s. 5; 1981, c. 932, s. 2.1.

§ 113A-112.
Planning grants.

The Secretary is authorized to make grants to local governmental units for the purpose of assisting in the development of local plans and management programs under this Article. The Secretary shall develop and administer generally applicable criteria under which local governments may qualify for such assistance. The Secretary may condition payment of a grant on the completion of the local plan or management program and may pay the grant in installments based on satisfactory completion of specific elements of the plan or program and on approval of the plan or program by the Commission. Of the funds appropriated to the Department to make grants under this section, the Department may carry forward to the next fiscal year funds in the amount necessary to pay grants awarded or extended in any fiscal year.

History.

1973, c. 1284, s. 1; 1975, c. 452, s. 5; 1977, c. 771, s. 4; 1981, c. 932, s. 2.1; 1989, c. 727, s. 218(66); 1997-443, s. 11A.119(a); 2001-494, s. 6.

Part 3. Areas of Environmental Concern.

§ 113A-113.
Areas of environmental concern; in general.

The Coastal Resources Commission shall by rule designate geographic areas of the coastal area as areas of environmental concern and specify the boundaries thereof, in the manner provided in this Part.

The Commission may designate as areas of environmental concern any one or more of the following, singly or in combination:

Coastal wetlands as defined in G.S. 113-229(n)(3) and contiguous areas necessary to protect those wetlands;

Estuarine waters, that is, all the water of the Atlantic Ocean within the boundary of North Carolina and all the waters of the bays, sounds, rivers, and tributaries thereto seaward of the dividing line between coastal fishing waters and inland fishing waters, as set forth in the most recent official published agreement adopted by the Wildlife Resources Commission and the Department of Environmental Quality;

Renewable resource areas where uncontrolled or incompatible development which results in the loss or reduction of continued long-range productivity could jeopardize future water, food or fiber requirements of more than local concern, which may include:

Watersheds or aquifers that are present sources of public water supply, as identified by the Department or the Environmental Management Commission, or that are classified for water-supply use pursuant to

G.S. 143-214.1

;

Capacity use areas that have been declared by the Environmental Management Commission pursuant to G.S. 143-215.13(c) and areas wherein said Environmental Management Commission (pursuant to G.S. 143-215.3(d) or 143-215.3(a)(8)) has determined that a generalized condition of water depletion or water or air pollution exists;

Prime forestry land (sites capable of producing 85 cubic feet per acre-year, or more, of marketable timber), as identified by the Department.

Fragile or historic areas, and other areas containing environmental or natural resources of more than local significance, where uncontrolled or incompatible development could result in major or irreversible damage to important historic, cultural, scientific or scenic values or natural systems, which may include:

Existing national or State parks or forests, wilderness areas, the State Nature and Historic Preserve, or public recreation areas; existing sites that have been acquired for any of the same, as identified by the Secretary; and proposed sites for any of the same, as identified by the Secretary, provided that the proposed site has been formally designated for acquisition by the governmental agency having jurisdiction;

Present sections of the natural and scenic rivers system;

Stream segments that have been classified for scientific or research uses by the Environmental Management Commission, or that are proposed to be so classified in a proceeding that is pending before said Environmental Management Commission pursuant to

G.S. 143-214.1

at the time of the designation of the area of environmental concern;

Existing wildlife refuges, preserves or management areas, and proposed sites for the same, as identified by the Wildlife Resources Commission, provided that the proposed site has been formally designated for acquisition (as hereinafter defined) or for inclusion in a cooperative agreement by the governmental agency having jurisdiction;

Complex natural areas surrounded by modified landscapes that do not drastically alter the landscape, such as virgin forest stands within a commercially managed forest, or bogs in an urban complex;

Areas that sustain remnant species or aberrations in the landscape produced by natural forces, such as rare and endangered botanical or animal species;

Areas containing unique geological formations, as identified by the State Geologist; and

Historic places that are listed, or have been approved for listing by the North Carolina Historical Commission, in the National Register of Historic Places pursuant to the National Historic Preservation Act of 1966; historical, archaeological, and other places and properties owned, managed or assisted by the State of North Carolina pursuant to Chapter 121; and properties or areas that are or may be designated by the Secretary of the Interior as registered natural landmarks or as national historic landmarks;

Areas such as waterways and lands under or flowed by tidal waters or navigable waters, to which the public may have rights of access or public trust rights, and areas which the State of North Carolina may be authorized to preserve, conserve, or protect under Article XIV, Sec. 5 of the North Carolina Constitution;

Natural-hazard areas where uncontrolled or incompatible development could unreasonably endanger life or property, and other areas especially vulnerable to erosion, flooding, or other adverse effects of sand, wind and water, which may include:

Sand dunes along the Outer Banks;

Ocean and estuarine beaches and the shoreline of estuarine and public trust waters;

Floodways and floodplains;

Areas where geologic and soil conditions are such that there is a substantial possibility of excessive erosion or seismic activity, as identified by the State Geologist;

Areas with a significant potential for air inversions, as identified by the Environmental Management Commission.

Areas which are or may be impacted by key facilities.

Outstanding Resource Waters as designated by the Environmental Management Commission and such contiguous land as the Coastal Resources Commission reasonably deems necessary for the purpose of maintaining the exceptional water quality and outstanding resource values identified in the designation.

Primary Nursery Areas as designated by the Marine Fisheries Commission and such contiguous land as the Coastal Resources Commission reasonably deems necessary to protect the resource values identified in the designation including, but not limited to, those values contributing to the continued productivity of estuarine and marine fisheries and thereby promoting the public health, safety and welfare.

In those instances where subsection (b) of this section refers to locations identified by a specified agency, said agency is hereby authorized to make the indicated identification from time to time and is directed to transmit the identification to the Commission; provided, however, that no designation of an area of environmental concern based solely on an agency identification of a proposed location may remain effective for longer than three years unless, in the case of paragraphs (4)a and d of subsection (b) of this section, the proposed site has been at least seventy-five percent (75%) acquired. Within the meaning of this section, “formal designation for acquisition” means designation in a formal resolution adopted by the governing body of the agency having jurisdiction (or by its chief executive, if it has no governing body), together with a direction in said resolution that the initial step in the land acquisition process be taken (as by filing an application with the Department of Administration to acquire property pursuant to

G.S. 146-23

).

Additional grounds for designation of areas of environmental concern are prohibited unless enacted into law by an act of the General Assembly.

History.

1973, c. 476, s. 128; c. 1262, ss. 23, 86; c. 1284, s. 1; 1975, c. 452, s. 5; 1977, c. 771, s. 4; 1981, c. 932, s. 2.1; 1983, c. 518, s. 1; 1989, c. 217, s. 1; c. 727, s. 128; 1997-443, s. 11A.119(a); 2015-241, s. 14.30(u).

§ 113A-114.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1983, c. 518, s. 2.

§ 113A-115.
Designation of areas of environmental concern.

Prior to adopting any rule permanently designating any area of environmental concern the Secretary and the Commission shall hold a public hearing in each county in which lands to be affected are located, at which public and private parties shall have the opportunity to present comments and views. Hearings required by this section are in addition to the hearing required by Article 2A of Chapter 150B of the General Statutes. The following provisions shall apply for all such hearings:

Notice of any such hearing shall be given not less than 30 days before the date of such hearing and shall state the date, time and place of the hearing, the subject of the hearing, and the action to be taken. The notice shall specify that a copy of the description of the area or areas of environmental concern proposed by the Secretary is available for public inspection at the county courthouse of each county affected.

Any such notice shall be published at least once in one newspaper of general circulation in the county or counties affected at least 30 days before the date on which the public hearing is scheduled to begin.

Any person who desires to be heard at such public hearing shall give notice thereof in writing to the Secretary on or before the first date set for the hearing. The Secretary is authorized to set reasonable time limits for the oral presentation of views by any one person at any such hearing. The Secretary shall permit anyone who so desires to file a written argument or other statement with him in relation to any proposed plan any time within 30 days following the conclusion of any public hearing or within such additional time as he may allow by notice given as prescribed in this section.

Upon completion of the hearing and consideration of submitted evidence and arguments with respect to any proposed action pursuant to this section, the Commission shall adopt its final action with respect thereto and shall file a duly certified copy thereof with the Attorney General and with the board of commissioners of each county affected thereby.

In addition to the notice required by G.S. 113A-115(a)(2) notice shall be given to any interested State agency and to any citizen or group that has filed a request to be notified of a public hearing to be held under this section.

The Commission shall review the designated areas of environmental concern at least biennially. New areas may be designated and designated areas may be deleted, in accordance with the same procedures as apply to the original designations of areas under this section. Areas shall not be deleted unless it is found that the conditions upon which the original designation was based shall have been found to be substantially altered.

History.

1973, c. 1284, s. 1; 1975, c. 452, s. 5; 1975, 2nd Sess., c. 983, s. 78; 1981, c. 932, s. 2.1; 1987, c. 827, s. 135; 2000-189, s. 11.

§ 113A-115.1.
Limitations on erosion control structures.

As used in this section:

“Erosion control structure” means a breakwater, bulkhead, groin, jetty, revetment, seawall, or any similar structure.

(1a)

“Estuarine shoreline” means all shorelines that are not ocean shorelines that border estuarine waters as defined in G.S. 113A-113(b)(2).

“Ocean shoreline” means the Atlantic Ocean, the oceanfront beaches, and frontal dunes. The term “ocean shoreline” includes an ocean inlet and lands adjacent to an ocean inlet but does not include that portion of any inlet and lands adjacent to the inlet that exhibits characteristics of estuarine shorelines.

“Terminal groin” means one or more structures constructed at the terminus of an island or on the side of an inlet, with a main stem generally perpendicular to the beach shoreline, that is primarily intended to protect the terminus of the island from shoreline erosion and inlet migration. A “terminal groin” shall be pre-filled with beach quality sand and allow sand moving in the littoral zone to flow past the structure. A “terminal groin” may include other design features, such as a number of smaller supporting structures, that are consistent with sound engineering practices and as recommended by a professional engineer licensed to practice pursuant to Chapter 89C of the General Statutes. A “terminal groin” is not a jetty.

No person shall construct a permanent erosion control structure in an ocean shoreline. The Commission shall not permit the construction of a temporary erosion control structure that consists of anything other than sandbags in an ocean shoreline. This subsection shall not apply to any of the following:

Any permanent erosion control structure that is approved pursuant to an exception set out in a rule adopted by the Commission prior to July 1, 2003.

Any permanent erosion control structure that was originally constructed prior to July 1, 1974, and that has since been in continuous use to protect an inlet that is maintained for navigation.

Any terminal groin permitted pursuant to this section.

(b1)

This section shall not be construed to limit the authority of the Commission to adopt rules to designate or protect areas of environmental concern, to govern the use of sandbags, or to govern the use of erosion control structures in estuarine shorelines.

The Commission may renew a permit for a permanent erosion control structure originally permitted pursuant to a variance granted by the Commission prior to July 1, 1995, if the Commission finds that: (i) the structure will not be enlarged beyond the dimensions set out in the original permit; (ii) there is no practical alternative to replacing the structure that will provide the same or similar benefits; and (iii) the replacement structure will comply with all applicable laws and with all rules, other than the rule or rules with respect to which the Commission granted the variance, that are in effect at the time the structure is replaced.

(c1)

The Commission may authorize the repair or replacement of a temporary erosion control structure that was originally permitted prior to July 1, 1995, if the Commission finds that (i) the structure is located adjacent to an intertidal marine rock outcropping designated by the State as a Natural Heritage Area pursuant to Part 42 of Article 2 of Chapter 143B of the General Statutes and (ii) the replacement structure will comply with all applicable laws and with all rules, other than the rule or rules with respect to which the Commission granted the variance, that are in effect at the time the structure is replaced.

Any rule that prohibits permanent erosion control structures shall not apply to terminal groins permitted pursuant to this section.

In addition to the requirements of Part 4 of Article 7 of Chapter 113A of the General Statutes, an applicant for a permit for the construction of a terminal groin shall submit all of the following to the Commission:

Information to demonstrate that structures or infrastructure are threatened by erosion.

An environmental impact statement that satisfies the requirements of

G.S. 113A-4

. An environmental impact statement prepared pursuant to the National Environmental Policy Act (NEPA), 42 U.S.C. § 4321, et seq., for the construction of the terminal groin shall satisfy the requirements of this subdivision.

A list of property owners and local governments that may be affected by the construction of the proposed terminal groin and its accompanying beach fill project and proof that the property owners and local governments have been notified of the application for construction of the terminal groin and its accompanying beach fill project.

A plan for the construction and maintenance of the terminal groin and its accompanying beach fill project prepared by a professional engineer licensed to practice pursuant to Chapter 89C of the General Statutes.

A plan for the management of the inlet and the estuarine and ocean shorelines immediately adjacent to and under the influence of the inlet. The inlet management plan monitoring and mitigation requirements must be reasonable and not impose requirements whose costs outweigh the benefits. The inlet management plan is not required to address sea level rise. The inlet management plan shall do all of the following relative to the terminal groin and its accompanying beach fill project:

Describe the post-construction activities that the applicant will undertake to monitor the impacts on coastal resources.

Define the baseline for assessing any adverse impacts and the thresholds for when the adverse impacts must be mitigated.

Provide for mitigation measures to be implemented if adverse impacts reach the thresholds defined in the plan.

Provide for modification or removal of the terminal groin if the adverse impacts cannot be mitigated.

Proof of financial assurance verified by the Commission or the Secretary of Environmental Quality in the form of a bond, insurance policy, escrow account, guaranty, local government taxing or assessment authority, a property owner association’s approved assessment, or other financial instrument or combination of financial instruments that is adequate to cover the cost of implementing all of the following components of the inlet management plan:

Long-term maintenance and monitoring of the terminal groin.

Implementation of mitigation measures.

Modification or removal of the terminal groin.

Repealed by Session Laws 2013-384, s. 3(a), effective August 23, 2013, and applicable to permit applications submitted on or after that date.

The Commission shall issue a permit for the construction of a terminal groin if the Commission finds no grounds for denying the permit under

G.S. 113A-120

and the Commission finds all of the following:

The applicant has complied with all of the requirements of subsection (e) of this section.

Repealed by Session Laws 2013-384, s. 3(a), effective August 23, 2013, and applicable to permit applications submitted on or after that date.

The terminal groin will be accompanied by a concurrent beach fill project to prefill the groin.

Construction and maintenance of the terminal groin will not result in significant adverse impacts to private property or to the public recreational beach. In making this finding, the Commission shall take into account the potential benefits of the project, including protection of the terminus of the island from shoreline erosion and inlet migration, beaches, protective dunes, wildlife habitats, roads, homes, and infrastructure, and mitigation measures, including the accompanying beach fill project, that will be incorporated into the project design and construction and the inlet management plan.

The inlet management plan is adequate for purposes of monitoring the impacts of the proposed terminal groin and mitigating any adverse impacts identified as a result of the monitoring.

Except to the extent expressly modified by this section, the project complies with State guidelines for coastal development adopted by the Commission pursuant to

G.S. 113A-107

.

The Commission may issue no more than six permits for the construction of a terminal groin pursuant to this section, provided that two of the six permits may be issued only for the construction of terminal groins on the sides of New River Inlet in Onslow County and Bogue Inlet between Carteret and Onslow Counties.

A local government may not use funds generated from any of the following financing mechanisms for any activity related to the terminal groin or its accompanying beach fill project:

Special obligation bonds issued pursuant to Article 7A of Chapter 159 of the General Statutes.

Nonvoted general obligation bonds issued pursuant to G.S. 159-48(b)(4).

Financing contracts entered into under

G.S. 160A-20

or

G.S. 159-148

.

No later than January 1, 2019, and every five years thereafter, the Coastal Resources Commission shall report to the Environmental Review Commission on the implementation of this section. The report shall provide a detailed description of each proposed and permitted terminal groin and its accompanying beach fill project, including the information required to be submitted pursuant to subsection (e) of this section. For each permitted terminal groin and its accompanying beach fill project, the report shall also provide all of the following:

The findings of the Commission required pursuant to subsection (f) of this section.

The status of construction and maintenance of the terminal groin and its accompanying beach fill project, including the status of the implementation of the plan for construction and maintenance and the inlet management plan.

A description and assessment of the benefits of the terminal groin and its accompanying beach fill project, if any.

A description and assessment of the adverse impacts of the terminal groin and its accompanying beach fill project, if any, including a description and assessment of any mitigation measures implemented to address adverse impacts.

History.

2003-427, s. 3; 2004-195, s. 1.2; 2004-203, s. 43; 2011-387, s. 1; 2012-201, s. 2(a); 2013-384, s. 3(a); 2015-241, ss. 14.6(r), 14.30(v); 2017-10, s. 4.19; 2018-114, s. 15; 2020-3, s. 4.30(b).